Hawaii statutes.
§417E-11 Application of securities law.
All of the provisions of chapter 485A that are not in conflict with this
chapter shall apply to any take-over offer involving a target company in this
State. [L 1985, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2006, c 229, §12]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next